Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 216B.243, subdivision 3b, is amended to read: Subd. 3b. Nuclear power plant; new text begin certain new text end new construction prohibited; relicensing. (a) new text begin Except as provided in paragraph (c), new text end the commission may not issue a certificate of need for the construction of a new nuclear-powered electric generating plant. (b) Any certificate of need for additional storage of spent nuclear fuel for a facility seeking a license extension shall address the impacts of continued operations over the period for which approval is sought. new text begin (c) The commission may issue a certificate of need to construct a new nuclear-powered generating plant with a maximum generation capacity of 300 megawatts. new text end